test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-celkkid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - celkkiđ: # MLO, checked

    celkkiđ+V+Inf: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: celkkuđ
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: celkkuum
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciälkkoo
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ciälkkojeen
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ciälkkojeh
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: celkkuu
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ciälkkojim
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: celkkui
    celkkiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ciälkkojii
